Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2107
Director; powers and duties; costs.

(1) The director may make such examinations of any branch established and maintained in this state by an out-of-state state chartered bank as the director may deem necessary to determine whether the branch is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state and in accordance with safe and sound banking practices.

(2) The director may prescribe requirements for periodic reports regarding any out-of-state bank that operates a branch in Nebraska pursuant to the Interstate Branching By Merger Act of 1997. Any reporting requirements prescribed by the director under this subsection shall be consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to Nebraska state banks and appropriate for the purpose of enabling the director to carry out his or her responsibilities under the act.

(3) The director may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any branch in Nebraska of an out-of-state state chartered bank or any branch of a Nebraska state chartered bank in a host state, and the director may accept such reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting his or her own examinations or investigations.

(4) The director may enter into contracts with any bank supervisory agencies that have concurrent jurisdiction over a Nebraska state chartered bank or an out-of-state state chartered bank operating a branch in this state to engage the services of such agencies' examiners or to provide the services of department examiners to such agency.

(5) The director may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any branch in Nebraska of an out-of-state state chartered bank or any branch of a Nebraska state chartered bank in any host state. The director may, at any time, take such actions independently if he or she deems such actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under the act or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state. In the case of an out-of-state state chartered bank, the director shall recognize the exclusive authority of the home state regulator over corporate government matters and the primary responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to safety and soundness matters.

(6) The cost of any examination conducted under this section shall be assessed against such out-of-state state chartered bank in the manner set forth in sections 8-605 and 8-606 and paid for by such out-of-state state chartered bank.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 17.